Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 1
RIGHT TO APPRAISAL AND
PAYMENT FOR SHARES

7-113-101. Definitions.

As used in this article 113, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Affiliate" means a person that directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another person or is a senior executive of the other person. For purposes of section 7-113-102 (2)(d), a person is deemed to be an affiliate of its senior executives.

"Corporation" means the issuer of the shares held by a shareholder demanding appraisal and, for matters covered in sections 7-113-203 to 7-113-401, includes the surviving entity in a merger.

"Fair value" means the value of the corporation's shares determined:

Immediately before the effectuation of the corporate action to which the shareholder objects;

Using customary and current valuation concepts and techniques generally employed for similar businesses in the context of the transaction requiring appraisal; and

Without discounting for lack of marketability or minority status except, if appropriate, for amendments to the articles pursuant to section 7-113-102 (1)(e).

"Interest" means interest, from the effective date of the corporate action until the date of payment, at the legal rate as specified in section 5-12-101.

"Interested transaction" means a corporate action described in section 7-113-102 (1), other than a merger pursuant to section 7-111-104, involving an interested person in which any of the shares or assets of the corporation are being acquired or converted. As used only in this subsection (5):

"Beneficial owner" means any person that, directly or indirectly, through any contract, arrangement, or understanding, other than a revocable proxy, has or shares the power to vote, or to direct the voting of, shares; except that a member of a national securities exchange is not deemed to be a beneficial owner of securities held directly or indirectly by it on behalf of another person solely because the member is the record holder of the securities if the member is precluded by the rules of the exchange from voting without instruction on contested matters or matters that may affect substantially the rights or privileges of the holders of the securities to be voted.

When two or more persons agree to act together for the purpose of voting their shares of the corporation, each member of the group formed by the agreement is deemed to have acquired beneficial ownership, as of the date of the agreement, of all voting shares of the corporation beneficially owned by any member of the group.

"Excluded shares" means shares acquired pursuant to an offer for all shares having voting power if the offer was made within one year before the corporate action for consideration of the same kind and of a value equal to or less than that paid in connection with the corporate action.

"Interested person" means a person, or an affiliate of a person, that, at any time during the one-year period immediately preceding approval by the board of directors of the corporate action:

Was the beneficial owner of twenty percent or more of the voting power of the corporation, other than as owner of excluded shares;

Had the power, contractually or otherwise, other than as owner of excluded shares, to cause the appointment or election of twenty-five percent or more of the directors to the board of directors of the corporation; or

Was a senior executive or director of the corporation or a senior executive of any affiliate of the corporation and will receive, as a result of the corporate action, a financial benefit not generally available to other shareholders as such, other than:

Employment, consulting, retirement, or similar benefits established separately, and not as part of, or in contemplation of, the corporate action; or

Employment, consulting, retirement, or similar benefits established in contemplation of, or as part of, the corporate action that are not more favorable than those existing before the corporate action or, if more favorable, that have been approved on behalf of the corporation in the same manner as is provided in section 7-108-501; or

In the case of a director of the corporation who will, in the corporate action, become a director of the acquiring entity in the corporate action or one of its affiliates, rights and benefits as a director that are provided on the same basis as those afforded by the acquiring entity generally to other directors of the entity or affiliate.

"Preferred shares" means a class or series of shares whose holders have preference over any other class or series with respect to distributions.

"Senior executive" means the chief executive officer, chief operating officer, chief financial officer, and anyone in charge of a principal business unit or function.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1948, § 56, effective July 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-113-101 as it existed prior to July 1, 2020.

Cross references:

For additional definitions applicable to this article, see §§ 7-90-102 and 7-101-401.

7-113-102. Right to appraisal.

A shareholder is entitled to appraisal rights and to obtain payment of the fair value of that shareholder's shares in the event of any of the following corporate actions:

Consummation of a merger to which the corporation is a party if:

Shareholder approval is required for the merger by section 7-111-103 and the shareholder is entitled to vote on the merger; except that appraisal rights are not available to a shareholder of the corporation with respect to shares of any class or series that remain outstanding after consummation of the merger; or

The corporation is a subsidiary that is merged with its parent corporation under section 7-111-104;

Consummation of a share exchange to which the corporation is a party as the corporation whose shares will be acquired if the shareholder is entitled to vote on the exchange; except that appraisal rights are not available to any shareholder of the corporation with respect to any class or series of shares of the corporation that is not exchanged;

Consummation of a disposition of assets pursuant to section 7-112-102 (1) if the shareholder is entitled to vote on the disposition;

Consummation of a disposition of assets of an entity controlled by the corporation pursuant to section 7-112-102 (2) if the shareholders of the corporation were entitled to vote on the consent of the corporation to the disposition;

An amendment to the articles of incorporation with respect to a class or series of shares that reduces the number of shares of a class or series owned by the shareholder to a fraction of a share if the corporation has the obligation or right to repurchase the fractional share so created;

Any other amendment to the articles of incorporation, merger, share exchange, or disposition of assets to the extent provided by the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or resolution of the board of directors;

Consummation of a conversion of the corporation to nonprofit status pursuant to section 7-90-201;

Consummation of a conversion of the corporation to an unincorporated entity pursuant to section 7-90-206 (2) if the shareholder is entitled to vote on the conversion; or

Consummation of a division, as defined in section 10-3-1701 (4), to which the corporation is a party if the corporation does not survive the division, subject to the limitations set forth in section 10-3-1713.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the availability of appraisal rights under subsections (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(d), (1)(e), (1)(h), and (1)(i) of this section are limited in accordance with the following provisions:

Appraisal rights are not available for the holders of shares of any class or series of shares that is:

A covered security under section 18 (b)(1)(A) or 18 (b)(1)(B) of the federal "Securities Act of 1933", 15 U.S.C. 77r (b)(1)(A) and 77r (b)(1)(B); or

Not a covered security but is traded in an organized market and has a market value of at least twenty million dollars, exclusive of the value of the shares held by the corporation's subsidiaries, senior executives, directors, and persons known to the corporation owning more than ten percent of the shares; or

Issued by an open-end management investment company registered with the federal securities and exchange commission under the federal "Investment Company Act of 1940", 15 U.S.C. sec. 80a-1 et seq., and that may be redeemed at the option of the holder at net asset value.

The applicability of subsection (2)(a) of this section is determined as of:

The record date fixed to determine the shareholders entitled to receive notice of, and to vote at, the meeting of shareholders to act upon the corporate action requiring appraisal rights; or

The day before the effective date of the corporate action if there is no meeting of shareholders.

Subsection (2)(a) of this section does not apply and appraisal rights are available pursuant to subsection (1) of this section for the holders of any class or series of shares that is required by the terms of the corporate action requiring appraisal rights to accept for the shares anything other than:

Cash; or

Shares of any class or any series of shares of any corporation, or any other proprietary interest of any other entity, that satisfy the standards set forth in subsection (2)(a) of this section at the time the corporate action becomes effective.

Subsection (2)(a) of this section does not apply and appraisal rights are available pursuant to subsection (1) of this section for the holders of any class or series of shares where the corporate action is an interested transaction.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the articles of incorporation as originally filed or as amended may limit or eliminate appraisal rights for any class or series of preferred shares; except that an amendment to the articles of incorporation does not apply to any corporate action that becomes effective within one year after the effective date of the amendment if:

That action would otherwise afford appraisal rights; and

The amendment limits or eliminates appraisal rights for shares that:

Are outstanding immediately before the effective date of the amendment; or

The corporation is or may be required to issue or sell after the effective date of the amendment pursuant to any conversion, exchange, or other right existing immediately before the effective date of the amendment.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1950, § 56, effective July 1, 2020.

L. 2021:

(1)(g), (1)(h), and IP(2) amended and (1)(i) added, (HB 21-1013), ch. 144, p. 855, § 2, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-113-102 as it existed prior to July 1, 2020.

Cross references:

For the federal "Securities Exchange Act of 1934", see 15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq.

7-113-103. Assertion of rights by nominees and beneficial owners.

A shareholder may assert appraisal rights as to fewer than all the shares registered in the shareholder's name but owned by a beneficial owner other than the shareholder only if the shareholder objects with respect to all shares of the class or series owned by the beneficial owner and notifies the corporation in writing of the name and address and federal taxpayer identification number, if any, of each beneficial owner on whose behalf appraisal rights are being asserted. The rights of a shareholder who asserts appraisal rights under this subsection (1) for only part of the shares held of record in the shareholder's name are determined as if the shares as to which the shareholder objects and the shareholder's other shares were registered in the names of different shareholders.

A beneficial owner may assert appraisal rights as to shares of any class or series held on behalf of the beneficial owner only if the beneficial owner:

Submits to the corporation the shareholder's written consent to the assertion of the rights no later than the date specified in section 7-113-203 (2)(b)(II); and

Does so with respect to all shares of the class or series that are owned by the beneficial owner.

The corporation may require that, when a shareholder objects with respect to the shares of any class or series held by any one or more beneficial owners, each such beneficial owner must certify to the corporation that the beneficial owner and the shareholder or shareholders of all shares of that class or series owned by the beneficial owner have asserted, or will timely assert, the beneficial owner's appraisal rights as to all shares as to which there is no limitation on the ability to exercise appraisal rights. Any such requirement must be stated in the notice given pursuant to section 7-113-202.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1952, § 56, effective July 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-113-103 as it existed prior to July 1, 2020.